Maryland, session 2025, SB1042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–318.
(i) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Eligible construction” means construction of a new grocery store
or any substantial renovation of an existing grocery store.
(iii) “Grocery store” means a store that has:
1. all major food departments, including produce, meat,
seafood, dairy, and canned and packaged goods;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1042*

SENATE BILL 1042
2. more than 50% of total sales derived from food sales; and
3. more than 50% of total floor space dedicated to food sales.
(2) The governing body of Prince George’s County [may] SHALL grant, by
law, a property tax credit under this subsection against the county property tax imposed
on personal property that is owned by a grocery store that:
(i) completes eligible construction; and
(ii) is located in a healthy food priority area.
(3) The governing body of Prince George’s County shall, by local ordinance,
designate what constitutes a healthy food priority area for purposes of the tax credit under
this subsection, based on the following factors:
(i) the availability of fresh fruit, vegetables, and other healthy foods
in the area;
(ii) the income levels of local residents;
(iii) the transportation needs of local residents;
(iv) the availability of public transportation;
(v) any comments from municipal governments, if applicable; and
(vi) any other factors that the governing body considers relevant.
(4) A property tax credit granted under this subsection for a taxable year
may not exceed the amount of property tax imposed on the personal property of a grocery
store in that year.
(5) The governing body of Prince George’s County may establish, by law:
(i) limits on the cumulative amount of property tax credits granted
under this subsection;
(ii) additional limitations on the amount of the credit;
(iii) additional eligibility requirements for grocery stores to qualify
for the tax credit under this subsection;
(iv) additional criteria for what constitutes eligible construction that
may qualify a grocery store for the tax credit under this subsection; and

SENATE BILL 1042 3
(v) any other provisions necessary to carry out this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.